Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 7.5
PARK AND OPEN SPACE ACT

Section

29-7.5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Park and Open Space Act of 1984".

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 808, § 1, effective April 30.

29-7.5-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that there is a need for parks, trail systems, and open space in urban areas of this state, that existing rights-of-way for high voltage electric transmission lines in such areas occupy significant land which could also be utilized for parks, trail systems, and open space, and that the safety of these lines could be enhanced by adopting appropriate safety measures as a part of utilizing this land for parks, trail systems, and open space. The general assembly further declares that the purpose of this article is to encourage the dedication and the utilization of such land for public parks, trail systems, and open space and the implementation of additional safety measures for these electric transmission lines.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 808, § 1, effective April 30.

29-7.5-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"High voltage line" means any overhead line for the transmission of electric current with a nominal voltage in excess of sixty-nine kilovolts and all supporting structures and accessories necessary for such line.

"Park and open space" means any land accepted as a public park, a public trail, or a public open space by the applicable park board.

"Park board" means the governing body of any local governmental entity within the state which is authorized by state law to accept land for public park, trail, or open space purposes.

"Transmission right-of-way" means any right-of-way, easement, or other land utilized for a high voltage line.

"Urban area" means any land located within any incorporated city or municipality. The term also means any land located in the unincorporated areas of any county which is zoned as residential land and for which a final plat for subdivided land has been approved by the board of county commissioners pursuant to section 30-28-110 (3) and (4), C.R.S., and which is also included in a local governmental entity which has a statutory authorization to provide for public parks, trails, or open spaces.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 808, § 1, effective April 30.

29-7.5-104. Use as park, trail, or open space.

In any urban area, the owners of any transmission right-of-way and the fee owner of any land subject to any transmission right-of-way may offer to dedicate or grant use of the transmission right-of-way to the park board for a public park, a public trail, or a public open space. This article shall not apply to any dedication or grant of use of a transmission right-of-way unless both the owner of the transmission right-of-way and the fee owner of the land involved consent to the dedication or grant of use. The park board may accept or reject this offered dedication or use of the transmission right-of-way based on the reasonable needs of the public, applicable rules and regulations governing the park board, and other criteria normally applied by the park board in accepting or rejecting dedications of land. In accepting or rejecting such offer, the park board shall consider, among other factors, methods for enhancing the safety of the transmission right-of-way involved through design of the park, trail, or open space improvements. The park board shall also consider and protect the interests and property rights of adjacent landowners, particularly those adjacent to the termination points of trails, who are not participating in the dedication or grant of use of the transmission right-of-way. If needed, the park board shall provide an access or egress from the point of termination to a public street or highway. For purposes of this article, the right of eminent domain shall not be exercised to obtain ingress or egress. Nothing in this article shall prevent negotiations for a dedication or grant of use of a transmission right-of-way in incorporated areas from occurring during the subdivision approval process; except that such dedication or grant of use shall not be finalized until the final subdivision plat is approved.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 808, § 1, effective April 30.

29-7.5-105. Limitations on liability.

If a transmission right-of-way has been accepted by the park board as park, trail, or open space, then neither the owners or operators of the high voltage line, transmission right-of-way, or land subject to the transmission right-of-way, nor the governmental or quasi-governmental entity exercising jurisdiction over the park board, nor any of their employees, officers, agents, or board or council members shall have any liability for any injury to person or property or for the death of any person caused by an act or omission of such person or party on the dedicated lands.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 809, § 1, effective April 30.

29-7.5-106. When liability is not limited.

Nothing in this article limits in any way any liability which would otherwise exist for loss, injury, or death due to gross negligence or willful misconduct. If the provisions of article 41 of title 33, C.R.S., also apply to persons for whom liability is limited pursuant to section 29-7.5-105, the liability and limitations on liability in this article shall supersede article 41 of title 33, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 810, § 1, effective April 30.